Indiana, session 2026, HB1329.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-5-50.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 50.1. Real Property Assessment Task Force
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "task force" refers to the real
property assessment task force established by section 2 of this
chapter.
Sec. 2. The real property assessment task force is established.
Sec. 3. (a) The task force consists of the following members:
(1) Two (2) legislative members appointed by the speaker.
(2) Two (2) legislative members appointed by the minority
leader of the house.
(3) Two (2) legislative members appointed by the president
pro tempore.
(4) Two (2) legislative members appointed by the minority
leader of the senate.
(5) The following members appointed jointly by the speaker
HB 1329—LS 7022/DI 120


and the president pro tempore upon the recommendation of
each represented organization:
(A) An individual representing the Indiana Association of
Realtors.
(B) An individual representing the Indiana Farm Bureau.
(C) An individual representing the Association of Indiana
Counties.
(D) An individual representing the Indiana County
Assessors Association.
(E) An individual representing the Indiana Auditors
Association.
(F) An individual representing Accelerate Indiana
Municipalities.
(G) An individual representing the Hoosier State Chapter
of the Appraisal Institute.
(H) An individual representing the Indiana Builders
Association.
(I) An individual representing the Indiana Bankers
Association.
(J) An individual representing the Indiana Manufacturers
Association.
(K) An individual representing the Indiana Apartment
Association.
(L) An individual representing the Indiana Manufactured
Housing Association.
(M) An Indiana resident with academic expertise from an
accredited higher education institution in Indiana on the
topics of:
(i) the application of Indiana real and personal property
assessment provisions; and
(ii) Indiana local government finance.
(b) The speaker shall designate a member appointed under
subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2) as a co-chair of the task force.
(c) The president pro tempore shall designate a member
appointed under subsection (a)(3) or (a)(4) as a co-chair of the task
force.
(d) A vacancy on the task force must be filled by the
appointment of a replacement member by the appointing authority
identified in subsection (a).
Sec. 4. (a) A majority of the members of the task force
constitutes a quorum.
(b) The affirmative vote of a majority of the members at a
HB 1329—LS 7022/DI 120


meeting at which a quorum is present is necessary for the task
force to take official action, other than to meet and take testimony.
(c) The task force shall meet at the call of the co-chairs.
Sec. 5. All meetings of the task force shall be open to the public
in accordance with and subject to IC 5-14-1.5. All records of the
task force shall be subject to the requirements of IC 5-14-3.
Sec. 6. The task force shall do the following:
(1) Review other state approaches to real property
assessment, including the use in other states of automated
valuation model (AVM) systems for real property assessment.
(2) Study and make recommendations regarding how
automated valuation model (AVM) systems should be
incorporated into real property assessment in Indiana.
(3) Study the extent to which existing assessment methods and
procedures have led to inaccurate and nonuniform real
property assessments within classes of properties and across
classes of properties.
(4) Study the extent to which ratio studies are effective in
measuring the accuracy and equity of assessments.
(5) Study and consider the implications if Indiana were to
move from its current market value in use assessment
standard to a fair market value assessment standard.
(6) Study and make recommendations regarding whether
township assessors should be eliminated.
(7) Study and make recommendations regarding whether the
office of county assessor should be eliminated and its
functions and duties transferred to the county auditor.
Sec. 7. The task force shall, not later than November 1, 2026,
report the task force's findings and recommendations in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6 to the executive director of the
legislative services agency for distribution to the members of the
general assembly.
Sec. 8. The legislative services agency shall staff the task force.
Sec. 9. Each legislative member and each lay member of the task
force is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and travel
allowances paid to individuals serving as legislative and lay
members, respectively, on an interim study committee established
by the legislative council.
Sec. 10. The task force's expenses, including the payment of per
diem, mileage, and travel allowances under section 9 of this
chapter, are payable from amounts appropriated to the legislative
council.
HB 1329—LS 7022/DI 120


Sec. 11. This chapter expires January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
HB 1329—LS 7022/DI 120


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Ways and Means, to which was
referred House Bill 1329, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 2, between lines 4 and 5, begin a new line double block
indented and insert:
"(B) An individual representing the Indiana Farm
Bureau.".
Page 2, line 5, delete "(B)" and insert "(C)".
Page 2, line 7, delete "(C)" and insert "(D)".
Page 2, between lines 8 and 9, begin a new line double block
indented and insert:
"(E) An individual representing the Indiana Auditors
Association.".
Page 2, line 9, delete "(D)" and insert "(F)".
Page 2, line 11, delete "(E)" and insert "(G)".
Page 2, line 13, delete "(F)" and insert "(H)".
Page 2, line 15, delete "(G)" and insert "(I)".
Page 2, between lines 16 and 17, begin a new line double block
indented and insert:
"(J) An individual representing the Indiana Manufacturers
Association.".
Page 2, line 17, delete "(H)" and insert "(K)".
Page 2, line 19, delete "(I)" and insert "(L)".
Page 2, between lines 20 and 21, begin a new line double block
indented and insert:
"(M) An Indiana resident with academic expertise from an
accredited higher education institution in Indiana on the
topics of:
(i) the application of Indiana real and personal property
assessment provisions; and
(ii) Indiana local government finance.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1329 as introduced.)
THOMPSON
Committee Vote: yeas 23, nays 0.
HB 1329—LS 7022/DI 120